Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2691.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5387HV (2) 91 dg/jh H.F. 2691 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 554J.1 Definitions. 1 For purposes of this chapter: 2 1. âArtificial intelligenceâ means a machine-based system 3 that, for any explicit or implicit objective, infers from the 4 input the system receives to generate output that can influence 5 physical or virtual environments. 6 2. âInputâ means data, directives, or instructions that a 7 user provides to guide the creation of new output. 8 3. âOutputâ means new content that an artificial 9 intelligence generates based on a userâs input in relation to 10 the data used to train the artificial intelligence. âOutputâ 11 includes but is not limited to audio-visual media, images, 12 predictions, recommendations, and text. 13 4. âTrainâ means to expose an artificial intelligence to 14 data for the purpose of making the artificial intelligence 15 recognize patterns, relationships, and structures between data 16 so the artificial intelligence can employ knowledge of those 17 patterns, relationships, and structures to create new output. 18 5. âUserâ means a person that uses artificial intelligence 19 for the purpose of generating output. âUserâ does not include 20 a person giving data to an artificial intelligence for the 21 purpose of training the artificial intelligence. 22 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 554J.2 Ownership of output ââ 23 ownership of trained artificial intelligence. 24 1. A user whose input causes an artificial intelligence to 25 generate output shall be the owner of the output provided that 26 the terms of use for the artificial intelligence or a contract 27 the user has with the owner of the artificial intelligence does 28 not contain a provision altering the ownership of generated 29 output. If the terms of use for the artificial intelligence 30 or a contract between the user and the owner of the artificial 31 intelligence contains a provision relating to ownership of 32 generated output, ownership of generated output shall be 33 determined by the terms of use or contract. 34 2. A person that trains an artificial intelligence shall 35 -1- LSB 5387HV (2) 91 dg/jh 1/ 2 H.F. 2691 be the owner of artificial intelligence that results from the 1 training if all of the following apply: 2 a. The training data was lawfully acquired and used for 3 training purposes. 4 b. The person has not transferred ownership rights of the 5 resulting artificial intelligence to another person through a 6 contract or agreement. 7